apertium-nya.nya.twol
Alphabet
 A B Ç D E Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ü w y ý z
 %{A%}:a
 %{I%}:i
 %{U%}:u
 %{B%}:b
 %{D%}:d
 %{H%}:h
 %{L%}:d
! %{M%}:m
 %{T%}:t
 %{W%}:w 
 %{Z%}:z
 %{NULL%}:0
 %>:0 ;

Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y Ý 
        a e ä i o ö u ü y ý ;

Aspirant = K P T
           k p t ;

Rules 

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Turn {L} into l after %{A%}%>. maluwa"
%{L%}:l <=> %{A%}: %>: _ ;

"Turn {D} into 0 after %{A%}%>. mazira"
%{D%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: _ ;

"Turn {DI} into 0 after %{A%}%>. maso Part II. (Part I is carried out above). Conflict!"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: %{D%}: _ ;

"Turn {DZ} into 0 after %{A%}%>. maiko, maina Part II. (Part I is carried out above)."
%{Z%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: %{D%}: _ ;

"Turn {DZA} into 0 after %{A%}%>. manja Part III. (Parts I&II are carried out above)."
%{A%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: %{D%}: %{Z%}: _ ;

"Turn {DZI} into 0 after %{A%}%>. mano Part III. (Parts I&II are carried out above). Conflict!"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: %{D%}: %{Z%}: _ ;

"Turn {T} into 0 after Vowel%>. masamba, misinje, masiku"
%{T%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>: _ ;

"Turn {B} into w after a. mawondo, mawere"
%{B%}:w <=> :a %>: _ ;

"Turn {W} into y after i. miyendo, miyala"
%{W%}:y <=> :i %>: _ ;

"Turn {W} into 0 after a. awamuna, awana Part I"
%{W%}:0 <=> :a %>: _ ;

"Turn {A} into 0 after a. awamuna, awana Part II"
%{A%}:0 <=> :a %>: %{W%}: _ ;

"Turn {U} into 0 after a. aunthu"
%{U%}:0 <=> :a %>: _ ;

"Turn {U} into 0 after i. miuzu, miutu"
%{U%}:0 <=> :i %>: _ ;

"Turn {H} into 0 after %{A%}%>. aspirant followed by {H} in the plural"
%{H%}:0 <=> %{A%}: %>: :Aspirant _ ;

"Turn {A} into 0 before i. wina, ina, etc "
%{A%}:0 <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* :i ;

!"Turn {A} into 0 before i. wina, ina, etc Crashed! Core dumped! "
!%{A%}:0 <=> _ %>: :i ;"

! "Turn {I} into 0 before a. caka, zaka. Conflict!"
! %{I%}:0 <=> _ %>: :a ;"

! "Turn {I} into 0 before m. mimoto. Conflict!"
! %{I%}:0 <=> _ %>: :m ;"

! "Turn {M} into 0 after m. moto"
! %{M%}:0 <=> :m %>: _ ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
